test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-párra_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - tjaktja: # GÁDDE
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Nom: tjaktja
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Gen: tjavtja
    tjaktja+N+Sg+Ill: tjaktjaj
    tjaktja+N+Pl+Ill: tjavtjajda
    tjaktja+N+Ess: tjaktjan
    tjaktja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavtjasj
    tjaktja+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: tjavtjatjasj
    tjaktja+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjadibme
    tjaktja+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjaktja+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjalasj
    tjaktja+N+Abe: [tjavtjadak, tjavtjada] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
#    tjaktja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: tjaktjas
#    tjaktja+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: tjaktjasimme
    tjaktja+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjap
    tjaktja+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: tjavtjamus

  Noun - boassjo: # GÁDDE
    boassjo+G3+N+Sg+Nom: boassjo
    boassjo+G3+N+Sg+Gen: boassjo
    boassjo+G3+N+Sg+Ill: boassjuj
    boassjo+G3+N+Pl+Ill: boassjojda
    boassjo+G3+N+Ess: boassjon
#    boassjo+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: boassjos
#    boassjo+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: boassjusimme
    boassjo+G3+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: boassjop
    boassjo+G3+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: boassjomus
    boassjo+G3+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: båssjulasj

  Noun - berajgiella: # SÁMEGIEL
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Nom: berajgiella
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Acc: berajgielav
    berajgiella+N+Sg+Com: berajgielajn
    berajgiella+N+Ess: berajgiellan
    berajgiella+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berajgielasj
    berajgiella+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berajgielatjasj
    berajgiella+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: berajgieladibme
    berajgiella+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    berajgiella+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: berajgielalasj
    berajgiella+N+Der/k+A+Sg+Nom: berajgielak
    berajgiella+N+Abe: [berajgieladak, berajgielada] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
#    berajgiella+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: berajgiellas
#    berajgiella+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: berajgiellasimme

  Noun - báktedarrha: # DARRHA
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarrha
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Gen: báktedarhá
    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Ill: báktedarrhaj
    báktedarrha+N+Pl+Ill: báktedarhájda
    báktedarrha+N+Ess: báktedarrhan
    báktedarrha+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarhásj
    báktedarrha+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: báktedarhátjasj
    báktedarrha+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: báktedarhádibme
    báktedarrha+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    báktedarrha+N+Abe: [báktedarhádak, báktedarháda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
#    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: báktedarrhas
#    báktedarrha+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: báktedarrhasimme
    báktedarrha+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []

  Noun - vuolle: # ÅLGGO
    vuolle+N+Sg+Nom: vuolle
    vuolle+N+Sg+Gen: vuole
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ill: vuolláj
    vuolle+N+Pl+Ine: vuolijn
    vuolle+N+Pl+Com: vuolij
    vuolle+N+Pl+Ill: vuolijda
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ine: vuolen
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ela: vuoles
    vuolle+N+Ess: vuollen
    vuolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuolásj
    vuolle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vuolátjasj
    vuolle+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: vuoledibme
    vuolle+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
 #   vuolle+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: vuolálasj
    vuolle+N+Abe: [vuoledak, vuoleda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
    vuolle+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [] # ij válde px
    vuolle+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [] # ij válde px
    vuolle+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vuolep
    vuolle+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: vuolebut
    vuolle+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vuolemus
    vuolle+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: vuolemussaj
    vuolle+N+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: vuolemusát
    vuolle+N+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: vuolebusj
    
